Illinois, session 104th, SB1749.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Short-Term Rental Occupation Tax Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Booking transaction" means a transaction in which a 8hosting platform collects or receives compensation for 9facilitating a rental of a short-term rental located in this 10State by directly or indirectly allowing a reservation to be 11made for an occupant or collecting or processing payments 12through the hosting platform's online application, software, 13website, or system.14    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.15    "Hosting platform" or "platform" means a person who 16provides an online application, software, website, or system 17through which a short-term rental located in this State is 18advertised or held out to the public as available to rent for 19occupancy.20    "Hotel" has the same meaning as defined in the Hotel 21Operators' Occupation Tax Act.22    "Occupancy" means the use or possession by an occupant, or 23the right to the use or possession by an occupant, of any room   SB1749- 2 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1or rooms in a short-term rental for any purpose, or the right 2of an occupant to the use or possession of the furnishings or 3to the services and accommodations accompanying the use and 4possession of the room or rooms.5    "Operator" means any person operating a short-term rental.6    "Permanent resident" means any person who occupies or has 7the right to occupy a room or rooms in a short-term rental for 8at least 30 consecutive days, regardless of whether the person 9occupies the same room or rooms in the short-term rental 10during the entire 30-day period.11    "Person" means any natural individual, firm, partnership, 12association, joint stock company, joint adventure, public or 13private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 14executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 15by order of any court.16    "Rent" or "rental" means the consideration received for an 17occupant's occupancy, valued in money, whether received in 18money or otherwise, including all receipts, cash, credits, and 19property or services of any kind or nature.20    "Room" or "rooms" means any living quarters, sleeping 21accommodations, or housekeeping accommodations.22    "Short-term rental" means an owner-occupied, 23tenant-occupied, or non-owner-occupied dwelling, including, 24but not limited to, an apartment, house, cottage, condominium, 25or furnished accommodation, located in this State, where: (i) 26at least one room in the dwelling is rented to an occupant for   SB1749- 3 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1a period of less than 30 consecutive days; and (ii) all 2accommodations are reserved in advance; provided, however, 3that a dwelling shall be considered a single room if rented as 4such. "Short-term rental" does not include:5        (1) any dormitory or other living or sleeping facility 6    maintained by a public or private school, college, or 7    university for the use of students, faculty, or visitors;8        (2) any facility certified or licensed and regulated 9    by the Department of Human Services or Department of 10    Public Health;11        (3) any room in a condominium, cooperative, or 12    timeshare plan and any individually or collectively owned 13    single-family or multi-family dwelling house or room in 14    such dwelling that is rented for a period of at least 30 15    consecutive days and that is not advertised or held out to 16    the public as a place regularly rented for periods of less 17    than 30 consecutive days;18        (4) any migrant labor camp or residential migrant 19    housing permitted by the Department of Public Health;20        (5) a facility that provides housing only to patients, 21    patients' families, and patients' caregivers and not to 22    the general public and is owned and operated by a 23    nonprofit organization;24        (6) any apartment building inspected by the United 25    States Department of Housing and Urban Development or 26    other entity acting on behalf of the United States   SB1749- 4 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1    Department of Housing and Urban Development that is 2    designated primarily as housing for persons at least 62 3    years of age. The Department may require the operator of 4    the apartment building to attest in writing that the 5    building meets the criteria provided in this paragraph; 6    the Department may adopt rules to implement this 7    requirement; or8        (7) the rental, leasing, or letting of rooms or 9    accommodations for occupancy in a hotel. 10    Section 10. Rate; exemptions.11    (a) A tax is imposed upon each hosting platform that 12facilitates a short-term rental transaction in the State. The 13tax is imposed at the rate of 5% of 94% of the gross rental 14receipts from the short-term rental transaction. 15    (b) An additional tax is imposed upon each hosting 16platform that facilitates a short-term rental transaction in 17the State. That tax is imposed at the rate of 1% of 94% of the 18gross rental receipts from the short-term rental transaction.19    (c) No funds received pursuant to this Act shall be used to 20advertise for or otherwise promote new competition in the 21hotel industry.22    (d) The taxes are not imposed upon the privilege of 23engaging in any business in interstate commerce or otherwise, 24which business may not, under the Constitution and statutes of 25the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this   SB1749- 5 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1State. In addition, the tax is not imposed upon gross rental 2receipts for which the hosting platform is prohibited from 3obtaining reimbursement for the tax from the customer by 4reason of a federal treaty.5    (e) The taxes imposed by this Act shall not apply to a 6short-term rental transaction if: 7        (1) any of the parties to the transaction is an entity 8    that is organized and operated exclusively for religious 9    or charitable purposes;10        (2) that party possesses an active Exemption 11    Identification Number issued by the Department pursuant to 12    the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act; and13        (3) the short-term rental is in furtherance of the 14    purposes for which the religious or charitable entity is 15    organized.16    (f) Persons subject to the tax imposed by this Act may 17reimburse themselves for their tax liability under this Act by 18separately stating the tax as an additional charge, which 19charge may be stated in combination, in a single amount, with 20any tax imposed by any unit of local government.21    (g) If a hosting platform collects an amount (however 22designated) that purports to reimburse the platform for its 23short-term rental occupation tax liability measured by 24receipts that are not subject to the short-term rental 25occupation tax, or if a hosting platform, in collecting an 26amount (however designated) that purports to reimburse the   SB1749- 6 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1platform for its short-term rental occupation tax liability 2measured by receipts which are subject to tax under this Act, 3collects more from the customer than the short-term rental 4occupation tax liability from the transaction, then the 5customer shall have a legal right to claim a refund of that 6amount from the platform. However, if the amount is not 7refunded to the customer for any reason, the hosting platform 8is liable to pay that amount to the Department.9    (h) The tax imposed under this Act shall be in addition to 10all other occupation or privilege taxes imposed by the State 11of Illinois or by any municipal corporation or political 12subdivision thereof. 13    Section 15. Hosting platform collection and remittance of 14taxes. Any hosting platform that facilitates a booking 15transaction shall be required to: (i) assess, collect, report, 16and remit the tax to the Department; (ii) maintain records of 17any taxes collected under this Act that have been remitted to 18the appropriate taxing body and submit these records to the 19Department in accordance with this Act; and (iii) notify the 20short-term rental operator that the operator must comply with 21all applicable local, State, and federal laws, regulations, 22and ordinances, including this Act. 23    Section 20. Hosting platforms.24    (a) It is unlawful for any hosting platform to facilitate   SB1749- 7 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1a booking transaction for a short-term rental located in this 2State unless the hosting platform:3        (1) is first registered with the Department in 4    accordance with subsection (d); and5        (2) as a condition of registration with the 6    Department:7            (A) has obtained written consent for the 8        disclosure of the information required under Section 9        25 of this Act, and the furnishing of such information 10        in accordance with Section 25 of this Act, from all 11        operators with short-term rentals located in this 12        State who intend to short-term rent those dwellings or 13        rooms within those dwellings through the platform; and14            (B) has granted its own consent in writing for the 15        disclosure and furnishing of that information.16    (b) It is unlawful for any hosting platform to facilitate 17a booking transaction for a short-term rental located in this 18State if the dwelling or room within the dwelling is not 19lawfully registered, licensed, permitted, or otherwise allowed 20as a short-term rental pursuant to an applicable local, State, 21or federal law, regulation, or ordinance, including this Act, 22at the time it is rented.23    (c) Each hosting platform shall designate and maintain on 24file with the Department an agent for service of process in 25this State. If the registered agent is unable, with reasonable 26diligence, to be located, or if the hosting platform fails to   SB1749- 8 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1reasonably designate or maintain a registered agent in this 2State, the Director may deem himself or herself or another 3appropriate person an agent of the hosting platform for 4purposes of accepting service of any process, notice, or 5demand.6    (d) The Department may issue a certificate of registration 7to each hosting platform that meets the requirements of this 8Act and the rules for hosting platform registration adopted 9under this Act by the Department. 10    Section 25. Records and reporting.11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or 12Department action to the contrary:13        (1) Every hosting platform shall keep separate books 14    and records of the hosting platform's business so as to 15    show the rents and occupancies that are taxable under this 16    Act separately from the transactions of the hosting 17    platform that are not taxable under this Act. If any 18    hosting platform fails to keep such separate books or 19    records, the hosting platform shall be liable to remit the 20    tax at the rate designated in this Act upon the entire 21    proceeds from the short-term rental. The Department may 22    adopt rules that establish requirements, including record 23    forms and formats, for records required to be kept and 24    maintained by taxpayers. For purposes of this Section, 25    "records" means all data maintained by the taxpayer,   SB1749- 9 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1    including data on paper, microfilm, microfiche, or any 2    type of machine-sensible data compilation.3        (2) In accordance with rules adopted by the Department 4    and subject to applicable laws, for all booking 5    transactions it facilitates for short-term rentals located 6    in this State a hosting platform shall develop and 7    maintain a report that must include all of the following 8    information about each short-term rental booking 9    transaction:10            (A) the name of the operator;11            (B) the operator's or short-term rental's license, 12        registration, permit, or other number as applicable;13            (C) the physical address;14            (D) any room or dwelling designation;15            (E) the individual periods of rental by calendar 16        date;17            (F) the itemized amounts collected or processed by 18        the hosting platform for the rental, taxes, and all 19        other charges; and20            (G) any additional information that the Department 21        may require by rule.22    (b) The hosting platform shall submit the report to the 23Department monthly in the format requested by the Department 24and shall make the report, as well as any underlying records 25requested by the Department, available for audit by the 26Department upon the Department's request. The Department may   SB1749- 10 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1issue and serve subpoenas and compel the production of the 2report and underlying records as necessary to enforce hosting 3platform compliance with this Section. Such underlying records 4may not include copies of specific message exchanges between 5the hosting platform and an operator, short-term rental 6renter, or occupant, or between the operator and short-term 7rental renter or occupant.8    (c) The hosting platform shall maintain the report and 9underlying records for at least 3 years, in accordance with 10any rules adopted by the Department.11    (d) The Department shall share the report, sections of the 12report, underlying records, or any combination of those items, 13with an agency or local government of this State to ensure 14compliance with this Act, the laws of this State, and any local 15laws, regulations, or ordinances.16    (e) The Department may use the report and underlying 17records for tax auditing purposes, and local governments may 18use the reports and underlying records to ensure compliance 19with laws, ordinances, or regulations.20    (f) A hosting platform may not facilitate a booking 21transaction for a short-term rental located in this State 22unless the operator consents to the hosting platform's 23disclosure of the information required by this Section.24    (g) A hosting platform that operates in violation of this 25Section or the rules of the Department adopted under this Act 26shall be subject to fines up to $1,000 per offense and to   SB1749- 11 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1suspension, revocation, or refusal of a registration issued 2pursuant to this Act. For purposes of this subsection, the 3Department may regard as a separate offense each booking 4transaction a hosting platform facilitates in violation of 5this Act or the rules of the Department or each calendar day 6that such violation persists. 7    Section 30. State business licensing.8    (a) Before an operator engages in the business of a 9short-term rental in this State, the operator shall obtain a 10business license from the Department. In order to obtain a 11business license from the Department, the operator must first 12provide evidence to the Department that the short-term rental 13is lawfully registered, licensed, permitted, or otherwise 14allowed to operate as a short-term rental pursuant to the 15applicable local law, regulation, or ordinance.16    (b) An operator's business license number issued by the 17Department must be displayed on any advertisement or listing 18of a short-term rental and be physically displayed within the 19short-term rental.20    (c) If the Department notifies a hosting platform in 21writing that an advertisement or listing for a short-term 22rental in this State fails to display a valid business license 23number issued by the Department, the hosting platform must 24remove all advertisements or listings for that short-term 25rental from its online application, software, website, or   SB1749- 12 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1system within 3 business days unless the listing is otherwise 2brought into compliance with the law.3    (d) The Department shall revoke or refuse to issue or 4renew a short-term rental operator's business license when: 5(i) the Department determines that the operation of the 6subject short-term rental violates the terms of an applicable 7lease or property restriction; or (ii) the Department 8determines that the operation of the short-term rental 9violates a State, federal, or local law, ordinance, or 10regulation, or the short-term rental operator is the subject 11of a final order or judgment lawfully directing the 12termination of the premises' use as a short-term rental.  13    Section 35. Filing of returns and distribution of 14proceeds. Except as provided in this Section, on or before the 15last day of each calendar month, each hosting platform that is 16liable for the tax under this Act during the preceding 17calendar month shall file a return for the preceding calendar 18month with the Department, stating:19        (1) the name of the hosting platform;20        (2) the address of the principal place of business 21    from which the hosting platform engages in the business of 22    facilitating short-term rentals in this State;23        (3) the total amount of rental receipts received by 24    the hosting platform during the preceding calendar month 25    from renting, leasing or letting rooms in this State   SB1749- 13 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1    during the preceding calendar month;2        (4) the total amount of other exclusions from gross 3    rental receipts allowed by this Act;4        (5) gross rental receipts that were received by the 5    hosting platform during the preceding calendar month and 6    upon the basis of which the tax is imposed;7        (6) the amount of tax due; and8        (7) such other reasonable information as the 9    Department may require.10    If the hosting platform's average monthly tax liability to 11the Department under this Act does not exceed $200, the 12Department may authorize the platform's returns to be filed on 13a quarter annual basis, with the return for January, February, 14and March of a given year being due by April 30 of such year; 15with the return for April, May, and June of a given year being 16due by July 31 of such year; with the return for July, August, 17and September of a given year being due by October 31 of such 18year, and with the return for October, November, and December 19of a given year being due by January 31 of the following year.20    If the hosting platform's average monthly tax liability to 21the Department under this Act does not exceed $50, the 22Department may authorize the platform's returns to be filed on 23an annual basis, with the return for a given year being due by 24January 31 of the following year.25    Such quarter annual and annual returns, as to form and 26substance, shall be subject to the same requirements as   SB1749- 14 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1monthly returns.2    Notwithstanding any other provision in this Act concerning 3the time within which the hosting platform may file his 4return, in the case of any hosting platform that ceases to 5engage in a kind of business which makes the hosting platform 6responsible for filing returns under this Act, such platform 7shall file a final return under this Act with the Department 8not more than one month after discontinuing that business.9    Where the same person has more than one business 10registered with the Department under separate registrations 11under this Act, that person shall not file each return that is 12due as a single return covering all such registered 13businesses, but shall file separate returns for each such 14registered business.15    In the return under this Act, the taxpayer shall determine 16the value of any consideration other than money received by 17him in connection with the renting, leasing, or letting of 18rooms in this State in the course of his business, and the 19taxpayer shall include such value in his return. Such 20determination shall be subject to review and revision by the 21Department in the manner provided in this Act for the 22correction of returns.23    Where the taxpayer is a corporation, the return filed on 24behalf of such corporation shall be signed by the president, 25vice-president, secretary or treasurer or by the properly 26accredited agent of such corporation.  SB1749- 15 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1    The person filing the return shall, at the time of filing 2such return, pay to the Department the amount of the tax 3imposed under this Act, less a discount of 2.1% or $25 per 4calendar year, whichever is greater, which is allowed to 5reimburse the hosting platform for the expenses incurred in 6keeping records, preparing and filing returns, remitting the 7tax and supplying information to the Department on request.8    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 9taxpayer's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an original 10return, the Department may authorize the taxpayer to credit 11the excess payment against liability subsequently to be 12remitted to the Department under this Act, in accordance with 13reasonable rules adopted by the Department. If the Department 14subsequently determines that all or any part of the credit 15taken was not actually due to the taxpayer, the taxpayer's 16discount shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference 17between the discount as applied to the credit taken and that 18actually due, and that taxpayer shall be liable for penalties 19and interest on such difference.20    The proceeds collected from the tax under this Act shall 21be deposited into the same funds and in the same manner as 22proceeds are deposited under Section 6 of the Hotel Operators' 23Occupation Tax Act.24    The Department may, upon separate written notice to a 25taxpayer, require the taxpayer to prepare and file with the 26Department not less than 60 days after receipt of the notice,   SB1749- 16 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1on a form prescribed by the Department, an annual information 2return for the tax year specified in the notice. The annual 3return to the Department shall include a statement of gross 4receipts as shown by the taxpayer's last State income tax 5return. If the total receipts of the business as reported in 6the State income tax return do not agree with the gross 7receipts reported to the Department for the same period, the 8taxpayer shall attach to his annual information return a 9schedule showing a reconciliation of the 2 amounts and the 10reasons for the difference. The taxpayer's annual information 11return to the Department shall also disclose payroll 12information for the taxpayer's business during the year 13covered by the return and any additional reasonable 14information that the Department deems to be helpful in 15determining the accuracy of the monthly, quarterly, or annual 16tax returns provided for in this Section.17    If the annual information return required by this Section 18is not filed when and as required, the taxpayer shall be liable 19for a penalty in an amount determined in accordance with 20Section 3-4 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act until the 21return is filed as required. That penalty to be assessed and 22collected in the same manner as any other penalty provided for 23in this Act.24    The chief executive officer, proprietor, owner, or highest 25ranking manager shall sign the annual return to certify the 26accuracy of the information contained in the return. Any   SB1749- 17 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1person who willfully signs the annual return containing false 2or inaccurate information is guilty of perjury. The annual 3return form prescribed by the Department shall include a 4warning that the person signing the return may be liable for 5perjury.6    The provisions of this Section concerning the filing of an 7annual information return shall not apply to a taxpayer who is 8not required to file an income tax return with the United 9States Government. 10    Section 40. Incorporation of Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 11and Uniform Penalty and Interest Act. All of the provisions of 12Sections 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 5j, 6, 6a, 6b, 136c, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 14Act and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act 15shall apply to persons in the business of renting, leasing, or 16letting short-term rental rooms in this State to the same 17extent as if such provisions were included herein. 18    Section 45. Recordkeeping. When the amount due is under 19$300, any hosting platform that (i) fails to make a return 20under this Act, (ii) fails to keep books and records as 21required by this Act, (iii) makes a fraudulent return under 22this Act, or (iv) willfully violates any rule of the 23Department for the administration and enforcement of this Act 24is guilty of a Class 4 felony. When the amount due is under   SB1749- 18 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1$300, any officer or agent of a hosting platform who signs a 2fraudulent return made on behalf of the hosting platform is 3guilty of a Class 4 felony.4    Any person who violates any provision of Section 5 of this 5Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony. Each and every day any such 6person is engaged in business in violation of said Section 5 7shall constitute a separate offense.8    When the amount due is under $300, any person who accepts 9money that is due to the Department under this Act from a 10taxpayer for the purpose of acting as the taxpayer's agent to 11make the payment to the Department, but who fails to remit such 12payment to the Department when due is guilty of a Class 4 13felony. Any such person who purports to make such payment by 14issuing or delivering a check or other order upon a real or 15fictitious depository for the payment of money, knowing that 16it will not be paid by the depository, shall be guilty of a 17deceptive practice in violation of Section 17-1 of the 18Criminal Code of 2012.19    Any hosting platform that collects or attempts to collect 20an amount (however designated) that purports to reimburse the 21hosting platform for a short-term rental operators' occupation 22tax liability measured by receipts that the hosting platform 23knows are not subject to short-term rental operators' 24occupation tax, or any hosting platform that knowingly 25over-collects or attempts to over-collect an amount purporting 26to reimburse such operator for short-term operators'   SB1749- 19 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1occupation tax liability in a transaction that is subject to 2the tax that is imposed by this Act, is guilty of a Class 4 3felony.4    When the amount due is $300 or more, any hosting platform 5that (i) fails to make a return under this Act, (ii) fails to 6keep books and records as required by this Act, (iii) makes a 7fraudulent return under this Act, or (iv) willfully violates 8any rule of the Department for the administration and 9enforcement of this Act is guilty of a Class 3 felony. When the 10amount due is $300 or more, any officer or agent of a hosting 11platform who signs a fraudulent return made on behalf of the 12hosting platform is guilty of a Class 3 felony.13    When the amount due is $300 or more, any person who accepts 14money that is due to the Department under this Act from a 15taxpayer for the purpose of acting as the taxpayer's agent to 16make the payment to the Department, but who fails to remit such 17payment to the Department is guilty of a Class 3 felony. Any 18such person who purports to make such payment by issuing or 19delivering a check or other order upon a real or fictitious 20depository for the payment of money, knowing that it will not 21be paid by the depository, shall be guilty of a deceptive 22practice in violation of Section 17-1 of the Criminal Code of 232012.24    A prosecution for any act in violation of this Section may 25be commenced at any time within 3 years of the commission of 26that act.   SB1749- 20 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1    Section 50. Intergovernmental sharing of information. Any 2information collected by the Department pursuant to this Act 3shall not be subject to the Freedom of Information Act. 4Information collected pursuant to this Act by the Department 5may be shared with local units of government upon request, 6provided that the information is treated as confidential at 7all times by the local unit of government. 8    Section 55. Local regulation. A unit of local government 9may adopt an ordinance or resolution regulating short-term 10rental activities within that unit of local government that 11imposes requirements not inconsistent with nor less stringent 12than those imposed by this Act. 13    Section 60. Severability. If any provision of this Act, in 14part or in full, or its application to any person, entity, or 15circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect 16other provisions or applications of the Act which can be given 17effect without the invalid provision or application, and to 18this end the provisions of this Act are severable. 19    Section 905. The Counties Code is amended by changing 20Section 5-1030 as follows: 21    (55 ILCS 5/5-1030)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1030)  SB1749- 21 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1    Sec. 5-1030. Hotel rooms, short-term rentals, tax on gross 2rental receipts. 3    (a) The corporate authorities of any county may by 4ordinance impose a tax upon all persons engaged in such county 5in the business of renting, leasing or letting rooms in a hotel 6or short-term rental which is not located within a city, 7village, or incorporated town that imposes a tax under Section 88-3-14 of the Illinois Municipal Code, as defined in the "The 9Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act or the Short-Term Rental 10Occupation Tax Act ", at a rate not to exceed 5% of the gross 11rental receipts from such renting, leasing or letting, 12excluding, however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds 13of such renting, leasing or letting to permanent residents of 14that hotel or short-term rental, and may provide for the 15administration and enforcement of the tax, and for the 16collection thereof from the persons subject to the tax, as the 17corporate authorities determine to be necessary or practicable 18for the effective administration of the tax.19    (b) With the consent of municipalities representing at 20least 67% of the population of Winnebago County, as determined 21by the 2010 federal decennial census and as expressed by 22resolution of the corporate authorities of those 23municipalities, the county board of Winnebago County may, by 24ordinance, impose a tax upon all persons engaged in the county 25in the business of renting, leasing, or letting rooms in a 26hotel or short-term rental that imposes a tax under Section   SB1749- 22 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b18-3-14 of the Illinois Municipal Code, as defined in the Hotel 2Operators' Occupation Tax Act or the Short-Term Rental 3Occupation Tax Act, at a rate not to exceed 2% of the gross 4rental receipts from renting, leasing, or letting, excluding, 5however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds of the 6renting, leasing, or letting to permanent residents of that 7hotel or short-term rental, and may provide for the 8administration and enforcement of the tax, and for the 9collection thereof from the persons subject to the tax, as the 10county board determines to be necessary or practicable for the 11effective administration of the tax. The tax shall be 12instituted on a county-wide basis and shall be in addition to 13any tax imposed by this or any other provision of law. The 14revenue generated under this subsection shall be accounted for 15and segregated from all other funds of the county and shall be 16utilized solely for either: (1) encouraging, supporting, 17marketing, constructing, or operating, either directly by the 18county or through other taxing bodies within the county, 19sports, arts, or other entertainment or tourism facilities or 20programs for the purpose of promoting tourism, 21competitiveness, job growth, and for the general health and 22well-being of the citizens of the county; or (2) payment 23towards debt services on bonds issued for the purposes set 24forth in this subsection. 25    (b-5) The county board of Sangamon County may, by 26ordinance, impose a tax upon all persons engaged in the county   SB1749- 23 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1in the business of renting, leasing, or letting rooms in a 2hotel that imposes a tax under Section 8-3-14 of the Illinois 3Municipal Code, as defined in the Hotel Operators' Occupation 4Tax Act, at a rate not to exceed 3% of the gross rental 5receipts from renting, leasing, or letting, excluding, 6however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds of the 7renting, leasing, or letting to permanent residents of that 8hotel, and may provide for the administration and enforcement 9of the tax, and for the collection thereof from the persons 10subject to the tax, as the county board determines to be 11necessary or practicable for the effective administration of 12the tax. The tax shall be instituted on a county-wide basis and 13shall be in addition to any tax imposed by this or any other 14provision of law. The revenue generated under this subsection 15shall be accounted for and segregated from all other funds of 16the county and shall be used solely for either: (1) 17encouraging, supporting, marketing, constructing, or 18operating, either directly by the county or through other 19taxing bodies within the county, sports, arts, or other 20entertainment or tourism facilities or programs for the 21purpose of promoting tourism, competitiveness, job growth, and 22for the general health and well-being of the citizens of the 23county; or (2) payment towards debt services on bonds issued 24for the purposes set forth in this subsection. 25    (c) A Tourism Facility Board shall be established, 26comprised of a representative from the county and from each   SB1749- 24 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1municipality that has approved the imposition of the tax under 2subsection (b) of this Section.3        (1) A Board member's vote is weighted based on the 4    municipality's population relative to the population of 5    the county, with the county representing the population 6    within unincorporated areas of the county. Representatives 7    from the Rockford Park District and Rockford Area 8    Convention and Visitors Bureau shall serve as ex-officio 9    members with no voting rights.10        (2) The Board must meet not less frequently than once 11    per year to direct the use of revenues collected from the 12    tax imposed under subsection (b) of this Section that are 13    not already directed for use pursuant to an 14    intergovernmental agreement between the county and another 15    entity represented on the Board, including the ex-officio 16    members, and for any other reason the Board deems 17    necessary. Affirmative actions of the Board shall require 18    a weighted vote of Board members representing not less 19    than 67% of the population of the county.20        (3) The Board shall not be a separate unit of local 21    government, shall have no paid staff, and members of the 22    Board shall receive no compensation or reimbursement of 23    expenses from proceeds of the tax imposed under subsection 24    (b) of this Section. 25    (d) Persons subject to any tax imposed pursuant to 26authority granted by this Section may reimburse themselves for   SB1749- 25 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1their tax liability for such tax by separately stating such 2tax as an additional charge, which charge may be stated in 3combination, in a single amount, with State tax imposed under 4the "The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act or the Short-Term 5Rental Occupation Tax Act ".6    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize a 7county to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in any 8business which under the Constitution of the United States may 9not be made the subject of taxation by this State.10    An ordinance or resolution imposing a tax hereunder or 11effecting a change in the rate thereof shall be effective on 12the first day of the calendar month next following its passage 13and required publication.14    The amounts collected by any county pursuant to this 15Section shall be expended to promote tourism; conventions; 16expositions; theatrical, sports and cultural activities within 17that county or otherwise to attract nonresident overnight 18visitors to the county.19    Any county may agree with any unit of local government, 20including any authority defined as a metropolitan exposition, 21auditorium and office building authority, fair and exposition 22authority, exposition and auditorium authority, or civic 23center authority created pursuant to provisions of Illinois 24law and the territory of which unit of local government or 25authority is co-extensive with or wholly within such county, 26to impose and collect for a period not to exceed 40 years, any   SB1749- 26 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1portion or all of the tax authorized pursuant to this Section 2and to transmit such tax so collected to such unit of local 3government or authority. The amount so paid shall be expended 4by any such unit of local government or authority for the 5purposes for which such tax is authorized. Any such agreement 6must be authorized by resolution or ordinance, as the case may 7be, of such county and unit of local government or authority, 8and such agreement may provide for the irrevocable imposition 9and collection of said tax at such rate, or amount as limited 10by a given rate, as may be agreed upon for the full period of 11time set forth in such agreement; and such agreement may 12further provide for any other terms as deemed necessary or 13advisable by such county and such unit of local government or 14authority. Any such agreement shall be binding and enforceable 15by either party to such agreement. Such agreement entered into 16pursuant to this Section shall not in any event constitute an 17indebtedness of such county subject to any limitation imposed 18by statute or otherwise.19(Source: P.A. 103-781, eff. 8-5-24.) 20    Section 910. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 21changing Sections 8-3-13, 8-3-14, and 8-3-14a as follows: 22    (65 ILCS 5/8-3-13)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-3-13)23    Sec. 8-3-13. The corporate authorities of any municipality 24containing 500,000 or more inhabitants may impose a tax prior   SB1749- 27 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1to July 1, 1969, upon all hotel operators in the municipality, 2as defined in the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act, or a 3short-term rental, as defined in the Short-Term Rental 4Occupation Tax Act, at a rate not to exceed 1% of the gross 5rental receipts from engaging in business as a hotel operator, 6excluding, however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds 7of the renting, leasing or letting of hotel rooms to permanent 8residents of a hotel or short-term rental and proceeds from 9the tax imposed under subsection (c) of Section 13 of the 10Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority Act.11    The tax imposed by a municipality under this Section and 12all civil penalties that may be assessed as an incident 13thereof shall be collected and enforced by the State 14Department of Revenue. The certificate of registration that is 15issued by the Department to a lessor under the Hotel 16Operators' Occupation Tax Act, or a business license issued by 17the Department under the Short-Term Rental Occupation Tax Act, 18shall permit the registrant to engage in a business that is 19taxable under any ordinance or resolution enacted under this 20Section without registering separately with the Department 21under the ordinance or resolution or under this Section. The 22Department shall have full power to administer and enforce 23this Section; to collect all taxes and penalties due 24hereunder; to dispose of taxes and penalties so collected in 25the manner provided in this Section; and to determine all 26rights to credit memoranda arising on account of the erroneous   SB1749- 28 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1payment of tax or penalty hereunder. In the administration of 2and compliance with this Section, the Department and persons 3who are subject to this Section shall have the same rights, 4remedies, privileges, immunities, powers and duties, and be 5subject to the same conditions, restrictions, limitations, 6penalties and definitions of terms, and employ the same modes 7of procedure, as are prescribed in the Hotel Operators' 8Occupation Tax Act, the Short-Term Rental Occupation Tax Act, 9and the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, as fully as if the 10provisions contained in those Acts were set forth herein.11    Whenever the Department determines that a refund should be 12made under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a 13credit memorandum, the Department shall notify the State 14Comptroller, who shall cause the warrant to be drawn for the 15amount specified, and to the person named, in the notification 16from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 17Treasurer out of the Illinois tourism tax fund.18    Persons subject to any tax imposed under authority granted 19by this Section may reimburse themselves for their tax 20liability for that tax by separately stating the tax as an 21additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 22in a single amount, with State tax imposed under the Hotel 23Operators' Occupation Tax Act or the Short-Term Rental 24Occupation Tax Act.25    The Department shall forthwith pay over to the State 26Treasurer, ex-officio, as trustee, all taxes and penalties   SB1749- 29 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1collected hereunder. On or before the 25th day of each 2calendar month, the Department shall prepare and certify to 3the Comptroller the disbursement of stated sums of money to 4named municipalities from which lessors have paid taxes or 5penalties hereunder to the Department during the second 6preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to each 7municipality shall be the amount (not including credit 8memoranda) collected hereunder during the second preceding 9calendar month by the Department, and not including an amount 10equal to the amount of refunds made during the second 11preceding calendar month by the Department on behalf of the 12municipality, less 4% of the balance, which sum shall be 13retained by the State Treasurer to cover the costs incurred by 14the Department in administering and enforcing the provisions 15of this Section, as provided herein. The Department, at the 16time of each monthly disbursement to the municipalities, shall 17prepare and certify to the Comptroller the amount so retained 18by the State Treasurer, which shall be paid into the General 19Revenue Fund of the State Treasury.20    Within 10 days after receipt by the Comptroller of the 21disbursement certification to the municipalities and the 22General Revenue Fund provided for in this Section to be given 23to the Comptroller by the Department, the Comptroller shall 24cause the warrants to be drawn for the respective amounts in 25accordance with the directions contained in the certification.26    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize a   SB1749- 30 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1municipality to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in 2any business that, under the Constitution of the United 3States, may not be made the subject of taxation by this State.4    An ordinance or resolution imposing a tax hereunder or 5effecting a change in the rate thereof shall be effective on 6the first day of the calendar month next following the 7expiration of the publication period provided in Section 1-2-4 8in respect to municipalities governed by that Section.9    The corporate authorities of any municipality that levies 10a tax authorized by this Section shall transmit to the 11Department of Revenue on or not later than 5 days after the 12effective date of the ordinance or resolution a certified copy 13of the ordinance or resolution imposing the tax; whereupon, 14the Department of Revenue shall proceed to administer and 15enforce this Section on behalf of the municipality as of the 16effective date of the ordinance or resolution. Upon a change 17in rate of a tax levied hereunder, or upon the discontinuance 18of the tax, the corporate authorities of the municipality 19shall, on or not later than 5 days after the effective date of 20the ordinance or resolution discontinuing the tax or effecting 21a change in rate, transmit to the Department of Revenue a 22certified copy of the ordinance or resolution effecting the 23change or discontinuance. The amounts disbursed to any 24municipality under this Section shall be expended by the 25municipality solely to promote tourism, conventions and other 26special events within that municipality or otherwise to   SB1749- 31 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1attract nonresidents to visit the municipality.2    Any municipality receiving and disbursing money under this 3Section shall report on or before the first Monday in January 4of each year to the Advisory Committee of the Illinois Tourism 5Promotion Fund, created by Section 12 of the Illinois 6Promotion Act. The reports shall specify the purposes for 7which the disbursements were made and shall contain detailed 8amounts of all receipts and disbursements under this Section.9    This Section may be cited as the Tourism, Conventions and 10Other Special Events Promotion Act of 1967.11(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (65 ILCS 5/8-3-14)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-3-14)13    Sec. 8-3-14. Municipal hotel and short-term rental 14operators' occupation tax. The corporate authorities of any 15municipality may impose a tax upon all persons engaged in such 16municipality in the business of renting, leasing or letting 17rooms in a hotel, as defined in the "The Hotel Operators' 18Occupation Tax Act," or a short-term rental, as defined in the 19Short-Term Rental Occupation Tax Act, at a rate not to exceed 206% in the City of East Peoria and in the Village of Morton and 215% in all other municipalities of the gross rental receipts 22from such renting, leasing or letting, excluding, however, 23from gross rental receipts, the proceeds of such renting, 24leasing or letting to permanent residents of that hotel or 25short-term rental and proceeds from the tax imposed under   SB1749- 32 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1subsection (c) of Section 13 of the Metropolitan Pier and 2Exposition Authority Act, and may provide for the 3administration and enforcement of the tax, and for the 4collection thereof from the persons subject to the tax, as the 5corporate authorities determine to be necessary or practicable 6for the effective administration of the tax. The municipality 7may not impose a tax under this Section if it imposes a tax 8under Section 8-3-14a.9    Persons subject to any tax imposed pursuant to authority 10granted by this Section may reimburse themselves for their tax 11liability for such tax by separately stating such tax as an 12additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 13in a single amount, with State tax imposed under the "The Hotel 14Operators' Occupation Tax Act" or the Short-Term Rental 15Occupation Tax Act.16    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize a 17municipality to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in 18any business which under the constitution of the United States 19may not be made the subject of taxation by this State.20    Except as otherwise provided in this Division, the amounts 21collected by any municipality pursuant to this Section shall 22be expended by the municipality solely to promote tourism and 23conventions within that municipality or otherwise to attract 24nonresident overnight visitors to the municipality. 25    No funds received pursuant to this Section shall be used 26to advertise for or otherwise promote new competition in the   SB1749- 33 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1hotel business.2(Source: P.A. 101-204, eff. 8-2-19.) 3    (65 ILCS 5/8-3-14a)4    Sec. 8-3-14a. Municipal hotel or short-term rental use 5tax.6    (a) The corporate authorities of any municipality may 7impose a tax upon the privilege of renting or leasing rooms in 8a hotel or short-term rental within the municipality at a rate 9not to exceed 5% of the rental or lease payment. The corporate 10authorities may provide for the administration and enforcement 11of the tax and for the collection thereof from the persons 12subject to the tax, as the corporate authorities determine to 13be necessary or practical for the effective administration of 14the tax.15    (b) Each hotel, short-term rental operator, or hosting 16platform acting as an agent for the short-term rental operator 17in the municipality shall collect the tax from the person 18making the rental or lease payment at the time that the payment 19is tendered to the hotel. The hotel shall, as trustee, remit 20the tax to the municipality.21    (c) The tax authorized under this Section does not apply 22to any rental or lease payment by a permanent resident of that 23hotel or short-term rental or to any payment made to any hotel 24that is subject to the tax imposed under subsection (c) of 25Section 13 of the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority   SB1749- 34 -LRB104 10237 HLH 20311 b1Act. A municipality may not impose a tax under this Section if 2it imposes a tax under Section 8-3-14. Nothing in this Section 3may be construed to authorize a municipality to impose a tax 4upon the privilege of engaging in any business that under the 5Constitution of the United States may not be made the subject 6of taxation by this State.7    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this Division, the 8moneys collected by a municipality under this Section may be 9expended solely to promote tourism and conventions within that 10municipality or otherwise to attract nonresident overnight 11visitors to the municipality. No moneys received under this 12Section may be used to advertise for or otherwise promote new 13competition in the hotel business.14    (e) As used in this Section, "hotel" has the meaning set 15forth in Section 2 of the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act.16    (f) As used in this Section, "short-term rental" and 17"hosting platform" have the meanings set forth in Section 5 of 18the Short-Term Rental Occupation Tax Act. 19(Source: P.A. 101-204, eff. 8-2-19.) 20    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2026.